Utah statutes.
62A-11-411.   Priority of notice or order to withhold income.

The notice to withhold provided by Section 62A-11-406, and a notice or order to withhold issued by the court in a civil action for income withholding, are prior to all other legal collection processes provided by state law, including garnishment, attachment, execution, and wage assignment.

